Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-3015
Digital asset depository; act as; charter to operate; required; application; fee.

(1) No corporation shall act as a digital asset depository without first obtaining a charter to operate from the director under the Nebraska Financial Innovation Act.

(2) The incorporators under section 8-3012 shall apply to the director for a charter. The application shall contain the digital asset depository institution's articles of incorporation, bylaws, a detailed business plan, a comprehensive estimate of operating expenses for the first three years of operation, a complete proposal for compliance with the provisions of the Nebraska Financial Innovation Act, evidence of the capital and surplus required under section 8-3013, and any investors or owners holding ten percent or more equity in the digital asset depository institution. The director may prescribe the form of application.

(3) A financial institution may apply to the director for a charter to operate a digital asset depository business as a department. The application shall contain a detailed business plan, a comprehensive estimate of operating expenses for the first three years of operation, and a complete proposal for compliance with the provisions of the Nebraska Financial Innovation Act. The director may prescribe the form of application.

(4) Each application for a charter shall be accompanied by an application fee of fifty thousand dollars.

Laws 2021, LB649, § 15;

Laws 2023, LB92, § 29.